Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-118.01
Military spouse, defined.

Military spouse means the spouse of an active duty service member in the armed forces of the United States.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 30;

Laws 2019, LB112, § 5.